Tennessee, session 114, HB2136.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. On or before January 1, 2027, the department of health shall submit a
report of each medication approved by the federal food and drug administration (FDA) for the
purpose of women's health, including a synopsis of each medication, to the speaker of the
senate and the speaker of the house of representatives.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2136
012114
- 1 -